Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.035

Commission—Home inspector referrals—Procedures.

The commission must establish procedures, to be adopted in rule by the director, for real estate agents to follow when providing potential homebuyers with home inspector referrals.

[ 2008 c 119 s 24.]